Rhode Island, session 2025, SB745.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16-13-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-13 entitled "Teachers’
Tenure" is hereby amended to read as follows:
16-13-4. Statement of cause for dismissal — Hearing — Appeals — Arbitration.
(a)(1) For districts other than the Providence public school district, the The statement of
cause for dismissal shall be given to the teacher, in writing, by the governing body of the schools.
The teacher may, within fifteen (15) days of the notification, request, in writing, a hearing before
the school committee or school board. The hearing shall be public or private, in the discretion of
the teacher. Both teacher and school board shall be entitled to be represented by counsel and to
present witnesses. The board shall keep a complete record of the hearing and shall furnish the
teacher with a copy. Any teacher aggrieved by the decision of the school board shall have the right
of appeal to the department of elementary and secondary education and shall have the right of
further appeal to the superior court. Any decisions rendered must be approved by a majority of the
full board. Members voting on a decision must have been in attendance at the hearing.
(2)(i) For the Providence public school district, a principal may dismiss or demote any
teacher or other person assigned full-time to the school, subject to the review and approval of the
superintendent; and subject to the provisions of this section, the superintendent may dismiss any
employee of the school district. In the case of employees whose duties require them to be assigned
to more than one school, and in the case of teachers who teach in more than one school, those
persons shall be considered to be under the supervision of the superintendent for all decisions

relating to dismissal or demotion for cause.
(ii) Teachers who have been teaching in a school system for at least ninety (90) calendar
days shall not be dismissed unless they have been furnished with written notice of intent to dismiss
and with an explanation of the grounds for the dismissal in sufficient detail to permit the teachers
to respond and documents relating to the grounds for dismissal, and, if they so request, have been
given a reasonable opportunity within ten (10) school days after receiving such written notice to
review the decision with the principal or superintendent, as the case may be, and to present
information pertaining to the basis for the decision and to the teacher's status. The teachers
receiving such notice may be represented by an attorney or other representative at such a meeting
with the principal or superintendent. Teachers without professional teacher status shall otherwise
be deemed employees at will.
(iii) A teacher with tenure shall not be dismissed except for inefficiency, incompetency,
incapacity, conduct unbecoming a teacher, insubordination or failure on the part of the teacher to
satisfy teacher performance standards developed pursuant to chapter 38 of this title or other just
cause.
(iv) A teacher with tenure status may seek review of a dismissal decision within thirty (30)
days after receiving notice of their dismissal by filing a petition for arbitration with the
commissioner. The commissioner shall forward to the parties a list of three (3) arbitrators provided
by the American Arbitration Association. Each person on the list shall be accredited by the National
Academy of Arbitrators. The parties each shall have the right to strike one of the three (3)
arbitrators' names if they are unable to agree upon a single arbitrator from amongst the three (3).
The arbitration shall be conducted in accordance with the rules of the American Arbitration
Association to be consistent with the provisions of this section. The board of education shall
determine the process for selecting arbitrators for the pool. The fee for the arbitration shall be split
equally between the two (2) parties involved in the arbitration. The rules governing this arbitration
procedure shall be the rules of the American Arbitration Association as pertains to arbitration.
(v) At the arbitration hearing, the teacher and the school district may be represented by an
attorney or other representative, present evidence, and call witnesses and the school district shall
have the burden of proof. In determining whether the district has proven grounds for dismissal
consistent with this section, the arbitrator shall consider the best interests of the pupils in the district
and the need for elevation of performance standards.
(vi) The arbitrator's decision shall be issued within one month from the completion of the
arbitration hearing, unless all parties involved agree otherwise, and shall contain a detailed
statement of the reasons for the decision. Upon a finding that the dismissal was improper under the
LC001469 - Page 2 of 4

standards set forth in this section, the arbitrator may award back pay, benefits, reinstatement, and
any other appropriate non-financial relief or any combination thereof. Under no circumstances shall
the arbitrator award punitive, consequential, or nominal damages, or compensatory damages other
than back pay, benefits or reinstatement. In the event the teacher is reinstated, the period between
the dismissal and reinstatement shall be considered to be time served for purposes of employment.
The arbitral decision shall be subject to judicial review as provided in chapter 9.2 of title 28.
(vii) With the exception of other remedies provided by statute, the remedies provided in
this section shall be the exclusive remedies available to teachers for wrongful termination.
(b) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to prohibit, or at any time to have
prohibited, a school committee in a municipality or regional school district with an elected school
committee, or the chief executive officer in a municipality with an appointed school committee
from agreeing, in a collective bargaining agreement, to the arbitration of disputes arising out of the
nonrenewal, dismissal, and/or suspension of a teacher pursuant to §§ 16-13-2, 16-13-3, and/or 16-
13-5.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001469
========
LC001469 - Page 3 of 4